


CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015































| Compare 
About Us | 
Contact Us






Home
Research Category
Publisher List
Custom Research
Cart
Compare



Research Category
User Guide
Policies
Contact Us
About us
Site Map











Home > Market Research Report  > Pharmaceutical > Pharmaceutical Companies > Pharma Info









Market Research Report
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015



Published by
Global Markets Direct
Product code
253772


Published
May 27, 2015
Content info
25 Pages 


Price








USD 1500

PDF by E-mail (Single user license)





USD 3000

PDF by E-mail (Site license)





USD 4500

PDF by E-mail (Global license)
























CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015



Published: May 27, 2015
Content info: 25 Pages














Description

Summary
Global Markets Direct's, 'CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015', provides an overview of the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s pharmaceutical research and development focus.
This report provides comprehensive information on the current therapeutic developmental pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s, complete with comparative analysis at various stages, therapeutics assessment by drug target, mechanism of action (MoA), route of administration (RoA) and molecule type. It also reviews latest updates, and featured news and press releases, along with special features on late-stage and discontinued projects.
Global Markets Direct's report features investigational drugs from across globe covering over 20 therapy areas and nearly 3,000 indications. The report is built using data and information sourced from Global Markets Direct's proprietary databases, Company/University websites, SEC filings, investor presentations and featured press releases from company/university sites and industry-specific third party sources, put together by Global Markets Direct's team. Drug profiles/records featured in the report undergoes periodic updation following a stringent set of processes that ensures that all the profiles are updated with the latest set of information. Additionally, processes including live news & deals tracking, browser based alert-box and clinical trials registries tracking ensure that the most recent developments are captured on a real time basis.
The report enhances decision making capabilities and help to create effective counter strategies to gain competitive advantage. It strengthens R&D pipelines by identifying new targets and MOAs to produce first-in-class and best-in-class products.
Note*: Certain sections in the report may be removed or altered based on the availability and relevance of data for the indicated disease.
Scope

 The report provides brief overview of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. including business description, key information and facts, and its locations and subsidiaries
 The report reviews current pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s human therapeutic division and enlists all their major and minor projects
 The report features product description and descriptive mechanism of action for key pipeline products along with the product's developmental history and major milestones
 Special feature on out-licensed and partnered product portfolio
 The report summarizes all the dormant and discontinued pipeline projects
 Latest company statement
 Latest news and deals relating to the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s pipeline products

Reasons to buy

 Evaluate CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s strategic position with total access to detailed information on its product pipeline
 Assess the growth potential of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. in its therapy areas of focus
 Identify new drug targets and therapeutic classes in the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s R&D portfolio and develop key strategic initiatives to reinforce pipeline in those areas
 Exploit in-licensing opportunities by identifying windows of opportunity to fill portfolio gaps
 Develop strategic initiatives by understanding the focus areas of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and exploit collaboration and partnership opportunities
 Identify emerging players with potentially strong product portfolio and create effective counter-strategies to gain competitive advantage
 Plan mergers and acquisitions effectively by identifying the most promising pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
 Develop and design in-licensing and out-licensing strategies by identifying prospective partners with the most attractive projects to enhance and expand business potential and scope
 Explore the dormant and discontinued projects of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and identify potential opportunities in those areas
 Avoid Intellectual Property Rights related issues




Table of Contents
Product Code: GMDHC07140CDBTable of Contents

Table of Contents 

List of Tables 
List of Figures 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Snapshot 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Overview 
Key Information 
Key Facts 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Research and Development Overview 

Key Therapeutic Areas 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Review 

Pipeline Products by Stage of Development 
Pipeline Products - Monotherapy 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products Glance 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Late Stage Pipeline Products 

Phase III Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Clinical Stage Pipeline Products 

Phase II Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Early Stage Pipeline Products 

Preclinical Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 


CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Drug Profiles 

lasmiditan succinate 

Product Description 
Mechanism of Action 
R&D Progress

COL-204 

Product Description 
Mechanism of Action 
R&D Progress

Conjugated Stigmine Program 

Product Description 
Mechanism of Action 
R&D Progress


CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Analysis 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Target 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Route of Administration 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Molecule Type 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Projects 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Locations And Subsidiaries 

Head Office 

Appendix 

Methodology 
Coverage 
Secondary Research 
Primary Research 
Expert Panel Validation 
Contact Us 
Disclaimer 


List of Tables

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Information 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Facts 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Indication, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase III, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase II, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Preclinical, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Target, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Route of Administration, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Molecule Type, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Developmental Projects,2015 

List of Figures

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Indication, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Target, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Route of Administration, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Molecule Type, 2015 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Top 10 Mechanism of Action, 2015 








Phone


Int'l: +1-860-674-8796
TollFree(US): +1-866-353-3335
Europe: +32-2-535-7543
Asia: +65-6223-2436


New for 2017 !

GII now purchases any market research reports from any publishers for you.  
			With noextra cost.
Contact us for more details.

FAQ


Delivery Time
User License
Payment Options
Compare Multiple Reports
















About
Contact
User Guide
Policies
Site Map



© Copyright 1997-2017, Global Information, Inc. All rights reserved.






CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015 : ReportsnReports


























 



 Market Research Report 


Welcome Guest  |  
					Register/Login | 
					Contact Us | 
					About Us
  




+ 1 888 391 5441








Advanced Search










Home › 
                    
                        Pharmaceuticals › 
                     Report Detail 



 CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015





						Published:  May 2015
						No. of Pages: 25

Price 
							
Single User License: US $ 1500
Corporate User License: US $ 4500
  
							


















Report Description
Table of Contents
 

Inquire Before Buying 










Global Markets Direct's, ?CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015', provides an overview of the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s pharmaceutical research and development focus.This report provides comprehensive information on the current therapeutic developmental pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s, complete with comparative analysis at various stages, therapeutics assessment by drug target, mechanism of action (MoA), route of administration (RoA) and molecule type. It also reviews latest updates, and featured news and press releases, along with special features on late-stage and discontinued projects.Global Markets Direct's report features investigational drugs from across globe covering over 20 therapy areas and nearly 3,000 indications. The report is built using data and information sourced from Global Markets Direct's proprietary databases, Company/University websites, SEC filings, investor presentations and featured press releases from company/university sites and industry-specific third party sources, put together by Global Markets Direct's team. Drug profiles/records featured in the report undergoes periodic updation following a stringent set of processes that ensures that all the profiles are updated with the latest set of information. Additionally, processes including live news & deals tracking, browser based alert-box and clinical trials registries tracking ensure that the most recent developments are captured on a real time basis.The report enhances decision making capabilities and help to create effective counter strategies to gain competitive advantage. It strengthens R&D pipelines by identifying new targets and MOAs to produce first-in-class and best-in-class products.Note*: Certain sections in the report may be removed or altered based on the availability and relevance of data for the indicated disease.ScopeThe report provides brief overview of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. including business description, key information and facts, and its locations and subsidiariesThe report reviews current pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s human therapeutic division and enlists all their major and minor projectsThe report features product description and descriptive mechanism of action for key pipeline products along with the product's developmental history and major milestonesSpecial feature on out-licensed and partnered product portfolioThe report summarizes all the dormant and discontinued pipeline projectsLatest company statementLatest news and deals relating to the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s pipeline productsReasons to buyEvaluate CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s strategic position with total access to detailed information on its product pipelineAssess the growth potential of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. in its therapy areas of focusIdentify new drug targets and therapeutic classes in the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s R&D portfolio and develop key strategic initiatives to reinforce pipeline in those areasExploit in-licensing opportunities by identifying windows of opportunity to fill portfolio gapsDevelop strategic initiatives by understanding the focus areas of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and exploit collaboration and partnership opportunitiesIdentify emerging players with potentially strong product portfolio and create effective counter-strategies to gain competitive advantagePlan mergers and acquisitions effectively by identifying the most promising pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Develop and design in-licensing and out-licensing strategies by identifying prospective partners with the most attractive projects to enhance and expand business potential and scopeExplore the dormant and discontinued projects of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and identify potential opportunities in those areasAvoid Intellectual Property Rights related issues





                               CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015                            


Table of ContentsTable of Contents 2List of Tables 3List of Figures 3CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Snapshot 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Overview 4Key Information 4Key Facts 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Research and Development Overview 5Key Therapeutic Areas 5CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Review 7Pipeline Products by Stage of Development 7Pipeline Products - Monotherapy 8CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products Glance 9CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Late Stage Pipeline Products 9Phase III Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 9CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Clinical Stage Pipeline Products 10Phase II Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 10CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Early Stage Pipeline Products 11Preclinical Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 11CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Drug Profiles 12lasmiditan succinate 12Product Description 12Mechanism of Action 12R&D Progress 12COL-204 14Product Description 14Mechanism of Action 14R&D Progress 14Conjugated Stigmine Program 15Product Description 15Mechanism of Action 15R&D Progress 15CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Analysis 16CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Target 16CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Route of Administration 17CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Molecule Type 18CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action 19CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates 20CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Projects 22CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Locations And Subsidiaries 23Head Office 23Appendix 24Methodology 24Coverage 24Secondary Research 24Primary Research 24Expert Panel Validation 24Contact Us 24Disclaimer 25List of TablesCoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Information 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Facts 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Indication, 2015 6CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 7CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 8CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase III, 2015 9CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase II, 2015 10CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Preclinical, 2015 11CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Target, 2015 16CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Route of Administration, 2015 17CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Molecule Type, 2015 18CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action, 2015 19CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates, 2015 20CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Developmental Projects,2015 22List of FiguresCoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Indication, 2015 6CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 7CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 8CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Target, 2015 16CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Route of Administration, 2015 17CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Molecule Type, 2015 18CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Top 10 Mechanism of Action, 2015 19




 

Published By: 
                            Global Markets Direct 

Product Code:
                            Global Markets Direct11224 







                        Did you find what you are/were looking for
                        ?
                        If not, read below and browse through other relevant pages for similar market research
                        reports OR get in touch with us through the form/contact info in your right navigation
                        panel and well share relevant market report titles for you to explore.
					


                            Related Reports:
                        





 Global Ion Channel Modulators Market Research Report 2017						
						In this report, the global Ion Channel Modulators market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.

Geographically, this report is segmented into ...  
 Global Albumin Market Research Report 2017						
						In this report, the global Albumin market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.

Geographically, this report is segmented into several key Reg...  
 Global Vaginitis Therapeutics Market Research Report 2017						
						In this report, the global Vaginitis Therapeutics market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.

Geographically, this report is segmented into ...  
 Global Urinary Tract Infection Therapeutics Market Research Report 2017						
						In this report, the global Urinary Tract Infection Therapeutics market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.

Geographically, this report is s...  
 Global Bone Anchored Hearing Aids Market Research Report 2017						
						In this report, the global Bone Anchored Hearing Aids market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.

Geographically, this report is segmented i...  
 Global Porcine Vaccine Market Research Report 2017						
						In this report, the global Porcine Vaccine market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.

Geographically, this report is segmented into several...  
 Global Pharmaceutical Market by Manufacturers, Countries, Type and Application, Forecast to 2022						
						The pharmaceutical industry discovers, develops, produces, and markets drugs or pharmaceutical drugs for use as medications. Pharmaceutical companies may deal in generic or brand medications.

Scope of the Report:
This report focuses on the Pharma...  
 2017-2022 United States Physiological Saline Market Report (Status and Outlook)						
						"This report will be delivered in 2-3 business days after the order is placed."

The Physiological Saline market size will be XX million (USD) in 2022 in United States, from the XX million (USD) in 2016, with a CAGR (Compound Annual Growth Rate) XX...  
 2017-2022 Philippines Physiological Saline Market Report (Status and Outlook)						
						"This report will be delivered in 2-3 business days after the order is placed."

The Physiological Saline market size will be XX million (USD) in 2022 in Philippines, from the XX million (USD) in 2016, with a CAGR (Compound Annual Growth Rate) XX% ...  
 2017-2022 Malaysia Physiological Saline Market Report (Status and Outlook)						
						"This report will be delivered in 2-3 business days after the order is placed."

The Physiological Saline market size will be XX million (USD) in 2022 in Malaysia, from the XX million (USD) in 2016, with a CAGR (Compound Annual Growth Rate) XX% fro...  









 







  
   



Why ReportsnReports.com?

500,000 market research reports and growing.
Top Fortune 500 Organizations trust us for research data.
24/7 support on call as well as emails.
Your Details are safe with us.
Free support for your research requirements.
Report Delivery: Email
Delivery Time:
                            
Upto 24 hrs - working days
Upto 48 hrs max - weekends and public holidays






Research Support / Custom Research
                    If this business study does not have the data and information analysis you need,
                    contact us with your research requirements. We explore available market research
                    reports to map your needs and share report titles with you. Alternatively, we can
                    also offer custom research that suits your budget and timelines. Share your information
                    requirements here.



                        Connect With Us





 









































Email: sales@reportsandreports.com
Call : + 1 888 391 5441 


 



Home
Category
Publisher
Country
Latest Reports
Markets
Discounted Reports
Upcoming Reports
Contact Us



Subscription Option



                                Using our subscription option, you get access to market research reports and industry data of  Consumer Goods market as per your needs. Get the best of Consumer Goods research reports by utilizing your research budgets in an optimum way.


More about our Subscription option 




Report Alerts

Get Email alerts about market research reports from industries and publishers of
							your interest:







Please Enter a Valid Email ID
Thank you! You have successfully subscribed to our Report Alerts!






 







 Avail upto 25% Discount on below Publisher Reports.

Technavio
Azoth Analytics







					© 2017 ReportsnReports. All rights reserved. Disclamer. 
						Privacy Policy , Terms and Conditions
					| Our Market Research Blog | Sitemap

Feeds: RSS | Latest Reports










CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 5:19 AM ET
Biotechnology

Company Overview of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company, develops small molecules for the acute treatment of migraine. Its lead product candidate is Lasmiditan, an oral tablet that is in Phase III clinical program for the acute treatment of migraine headaches in adults. The company is also developing IV lasmiditan, which is in Phase II clinical trial for the acute treatment of headache pain associated with migraine in adults in emergency room and other urgent care settings. The company was founded in 2005 and is headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts. CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is a subsidiary of Eli Lilly and Company.


222 Third StreetSuite 1320Cambridge, MA 02142United StatesFounded in 20057 Employees



Phone: 857-285-6495

www.colucid.com







Key Executives for CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.




Mr. Darren J. Carroll J.D.


      	President and Director
      








Mr. Matthew D. Dallas


      	Chief Financial Officer
      


Age: 42
        







Ms. Bernice Kuca


      	Head of Clinical and Regulatory Operations
      


Age: 58
        







Dr. Raymond D. Skwierczynski Ph.D.


      	Head of Pharmaceutical Operations
      


Age: 54
        







Mr. Joshua L. Smiley


      	Vice President, Treasurer and Director
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Key Developments

Colucid Pharmaceuticals Files Form 15

Mar 13 17
Colucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. has announced that it has filed a Form 15 with the Securities and Exchange Commission to voluntarily deregister its common stock, $0.001 par value per share under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.


Colucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Announces Executive Changes; Announces Amendments to the Company Bylaws
Mar 1 17
Colucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. announced In connection with the Merger, and pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement with Eli Lilly, each of Mark Corrigon, Martin W. Edwards, Alison Lawton, Luc Marengere, Thomas P. Mathers, Arthur M. Pappas and Marvin L. White resigned from his or her respective position as a member of the Board of Directors, and any committee thereof, of the company, effective at the Effective Time. Following the company merger and pursuant to the terms of the merger agreement, at the effective time, the directors of Eli Lilly as of immediately prior to the effective Time, Darren J. Carroll, Martin Bott and Joshua Smiley, became the directors of the company. The company following the merger and pursuant to the terms of the merger agreement, at the effective time, the officers of purchaser immediately prior to the effective time became the officers of the company following the effective time, with Darren J. Carroll appointed as President, Joshua Smiley appointed as Vice President and Treasurer, Bronwen Mantlo appointed as Secretary and David P. Lewis appointed as Vice President, Corporate Tax and Assistant Treasurer of the company. 


Pursuant to the terms of the merger agreement, at the effective time the certificate of incorporation of the company was amended and restated to read in its entirety in a form as mutually agreed by Lilly and the company and the bylaws were amended and restated to read in their entirety as the bylaws of Purchaser in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time.


NASDAQ Files Notification Of Delisting Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals’ Shares From NASDAQ On Form 25 With SEC
Mar 1 17
In connection with the closing of the Merger, CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. notified the NASDAQ Stock Market (NASDAQ) on March 1, 2017 that the Merger was consummated and trading of the Shares on NASDAQ has been suspended. Accordingly, NASDAQ has filed a notification of delisting of the Shares from NASDAQ and deregistration of the Shares under Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (Exchange Act) on Form 25 with the SEC. CoLucid intends to file a certification on Form 15 with the SEC to cause CoLucid’s reporting obligations under Sections 13 and 15(d) of the Exchange Act to be suspended.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 20n Labs, Inc. United States 23andMe, Inc. United States 2C Tech Corporation, Inc. United States 3-V Biosciences, Inc. United States 3Bar Biologics Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      January 18, 2017
			    
--





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., please visit www.colucid.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close






























CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015 | Acute Market Reports













About Us
 Contact Us
 Sitemap














Home
Our Services

Market Research Reports
Business Consulting
Prolonge Business Leverages
Plan Your Own Research


Industry Reports

Country Reports
Press Release
Login
Register





 Home / Healthcare / CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015 


CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015
Published: May 2015 | No Of Pages: 25 | Published By: Global Markets Direct



Report Summary  
  Table of content  
  List Of Tables  
  List Of Figures  
  Request Sample




CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015

Summary

Global Markets Direct's, 'CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015', provides an overview of the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s pharmaceutical research and development focus.

This report provides comprehensive information on the current therapeutic developmental pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s, complete with comparative analysis at various stages, therapeutics assessment by drug target, mechanism of action (MoA), route of administration (RoA) and molecule type. It also reviews latest updates, and featured news and press releases, along with special features on late-stage and discontinued projects.

Global Markets Direct's report features investigational drugs from across globe covering over 20 therapy areas and nearly 3,000 indications. The report is built using data and information sourced from Global Markets Direct's proprietary databases, Company/University websites, SEC filings, investor presentations and featured press releases from company/university sites and industry-specific third party sources, put together by Global Markets Direct's team. Drug profiles/records featured in the report undergoes periodic updation following a stringent set of processes that ensures that all the profiles are updated with the latest set of information. Additionally, processes including live news & deals tracking, browser based alert-box and clinical trials registries tracking ensure that the most recent developments are captured on a real time basis.

The report enhances decision making capabilities and help to create effective counter strategies to gain competitive advantage. It strengthens R&D pipelines by identifying new targets and MOAs to produce first-in-class and best-in-class products.

Note*: Certain sections in the report may be removed or altered based on the availability and relevance of data for the indicated disease.

Scope

- The report provides brief overview of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. including business description, key information and facts, and its locations and subsidiaries
- The report reviews current pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s human therapeutic division and enlists all their major and minor projects
- The report features product description and descriptive mechanism of action for key pipeline products along with the product's developmental history and major milestones 
- Special feature on out-licensed and partnered product portfolio
- The report summarizes all the dormant and discontinued pipeline projects
- Latest company statement 
- Latest news and deals relating to the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s pipeline products

Reasons to buy

- Evaluate CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s strategic position with total access to detailed information on its product pipeline
- Assess the growth potential of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. in its therapy areas of focus
- Identify new drug targets and therapeutic classes in the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.'s R&D portfolio and develop key strategic initiatives to reinforce pipeline in those areas
- Exploit in-licensing opportunities by identifying windows of opportunity to fill portfolio gaps
- Develop strategic initiatives by understanding the focus areas of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and exploit collaboration and partnership opportunities
- Identify emerging players with potentially strong product portfolio and create effective counter-strategies to gain competitive advantage
- Plan mergers and acquisitions effectively by identifying the most promising pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
- Develop and design in-licensing and out-licensing strategies by identifying prospective partners with the most attractive projects to enhance and expand business potential and scope
- Explore the dormant and discontinued projects of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and identify potential opportunities in those areas
- Avoid Intellectual Property Rights related issues


Table of Contents
Table of Contents 2
List of Tables 3
List of Figures 3
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Snapshot 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Overview 4
Key Information 4
Key Facts 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Research and Development Overview 5
Key Therapeutic Areas 5
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Review 7
Pipeline Products by Stage of Development 7
Pipeline Products - Monotherapy 8
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products Glance 9
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Late Stage Pipeline Products 9
Phase III Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 9
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Clinical Stage Pipeline Products 10
Phase II Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 10
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Early Stage Pipeline Products 11
Preclinical Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 11
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Drug Profiles 12
lasmiditan succinate 12
Product Description 12
Mechanism of Action 12
R&D Progress 12
COL-204 14
Product Description 14
Mechanism of Action 14
R&D Progress 14
Conjugated Stigmine Program 15
Product Description 15
Mechanism of Action 15
R&D Progress 15
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Analysis 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Target 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Route of Administration 17
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Molecule Type 18
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action 19
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates 20
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Projects 22
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Locations And Subsidiaries 23
Head Office 23
Appendix 24
Methodology 24
Coverage 24
Secondary Research 24
Primary Research 24
Expert Panel Validation 24
Contact Us 24
Disclaimer 25 

CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Information 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Facts 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Indication, 2015 6
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 7
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 8
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase III, 2015 9
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase II, 2015 10
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Preclinical, 2015 11
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Target, 2015 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Route of Administration, 2015 17
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Molecule Type, 2015 18
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action, 2015 19
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates, 2015 20
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Developmental Projects,2015 22 
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Indication, 2015 6
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 7
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 8
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Target, 2015 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Route of Administration, 2015 17
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Molecule Type, 2015 18
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Top 10 Mechanism of Action, 2015 19  



Choose License Type 



Single User - $1500
Multi User - $3000
Enterprise - $4500


Buy Now
 



Contact Information 

 24/7 Research Support
 Phone: +1-855-455-8662 
 sales@acutemarketreports.com



Get in Touch with us 

 join us on Facebook
 Follow us on Twitter
 Follow us on LinkedIn
 Add us on Google +








Home
 About Us
 Customer Faq
 How to order
 Privacy Policy
 Terms of use



© Copyright 2017 Acute Market Reports
        and its Affiliates. All Rights Reserved
     


Newsletter Sign Up
      Signup for latest updates & promos
      

SEND

Payment Options:
 

Contact us
  ACUTE MARKET REPORTS
        Office No 01, 1st Floor , 
        Aditi Mall, Baner, 
		Pune, MH, 411045 
		India
  Toll Free(US/CANADA): +1-855-455-8662  India: +91 7755981103 
  sales@acutemarketreports.com 










Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft






























 



 CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Announces Relocation of Company Headquarters to Massachusetts 
         










    










 






 











 









CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Announces Relocation of Company Headquarters to Massachusetts

Mar 24, 2015, 08:03 ET
		  		  						
						 from   CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc 











 
















































 

 















































 

 

 
 
 
 







CoLucid Pharmaceuticals    
 Facebook
 Twitter
 Pinterest

































 




 




CoLucid Pharmaceuticals
 


 

 




 





 


BURLINGTON, Mass., March 24, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a Phase 3 clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company that is developing its lead product candidate, Lasmiditan, for the acute treatment of migraine headaches, announced today the relocation of its corporate headquarters to Massachusetts. The Company is currently operating in Burlington while it searches for office space in the Cambridge area. 
"We are very proud to have been a North Carolina-based company since our inception. However, given the expansion of our management team with Massachusetts-based executives, we feel it is the right time to relocate. Cambridge is the heart of the biotechnology industry and we are very excited to be a part of all the innovation and excitement that takes place here every day," said Thomas P. Mathers, Chief Executive Officer of CoLucid.  
"We are thrilled to welcome CoLucid Pharmaceuticals to the Massachusetts life sciences community," said Robert K. Coughlin, President and CEO of MassBio, the Massachusetts life sciences trade association. "We know CoLucid will thrive in the ecosystem of innovation and collaboration here in the Commonwealth as they work to advance treatments for CNS disorders."
ABOUT LASMIDITAN
Lasmiditan has been designed to deliver efficacy for the acute treatment of migraine headaches in adults without the vasoconstrictor activity associated with previous generations of migraine therapies.  It selectively targets 5-HT1F receptors expressed in the trigeminal pathway.  Its novel chemical class and differentiated site and mechanism of action led to lasmiditan's designation as a "ditan," a new drug class, by the INN and USAN.
CoLucid has successfully completed seven clinical studies for Lasmiditan, including a TQTc study and a Phase 2b study treating a single migraine attack in 391 patients. Phase 3 development will address major unmet medical needs in patients who are poorly served by currently available therapies to include patients with risk factors for cardiovascular disease who may not be able to take triptans. 
We have a Special Protocol Assessment agreement with the FDA for our first pivotal Phase 3 clinical trial, SAMURAI, which includes two endpoints for the approval of acute migraine therapies—a primary endpoint of the proportion of patients who are free of headache pain two hours after dosing and a key secondary endpoint of the proportion of patients who no longer suffer from their most bothersome associated symptom of migraine (nausea, photophobia, phonophobia) two hours after dosing.
ABOUT MIGRAINE
Migraine is the leading cause of disability among neurological disorders in the United States according to the American Migraine Foundation.  An estimated 36 million Americans suffer from migraine.  Migraine can be extremely disabling and costly, accounting for more than an estimated $20 billion in direct (e.g. doctor visits, medications) and indirect (e.g. missed work, lost productivity) expenses each year in the United States.
ABOUT COLUCID PHARMACEUTICALS, INC.
CoLucid was founded in 2005 and is developing oral Lasmiditan for the acute treatment of migraine headaches in adults and intravenous Lasmiditan for the acute treatment of unspecified headache pain in adults in emergency room and other urgent care settings. The company's investors include Pappas Ventures, Domain Associates, Care Capital, Novo Ventures, Triathlon Medical Ventures, TVM Life Science Management, Auriga Partners and Pearl Street Venture Funds. 
CoLucid has entered into a distribution and supply agreement with ILDONG Pharmaceutical Co, Ltd. for Lasmiditan covering South Korea and certain Southeast Asia countries.
For more information please visit www.colucid.com. 
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20130626/LA37332LOGO 
 SOURCE  CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.colucid.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  

















Feb 09, 2015, 08:03 ET
Preview: CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Appoints Matthew Dallas as Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 








CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Inc - :CLCD - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Inc (CLCD)
Follow




                                    46.52
                                

0.03
0.05




Feb 28, 2017 4:00 PM EST












Prev Close
  46.50


Open
46.50


Day Low/High

                                    46.45 /
                                    46.55


52 Wk Low/High

                                    3.57 /
                                    10.04
                                


Volume
127.08K


Avg Volume 
547.40K











Exchange



Shares Outstanding
19.28M


Market Cap
897.30M


EPS
-3.80


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            N.A. (N.A)
                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News




Lilly Completes Acquisition Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals






INVESTOR ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Announces An Investigation Concerning Whether The Sale Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. To Eli Lilly & Co. For $46.50 Per Share Is Fair To Shareholders













Bragar Eagel & Squire, P.C. Is Investigating The Board Of Directors Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (CLCD) On Behalf Of Stockholders And Encourages Investors To Contact The Firm
Bragar Eagel & Squire, P.C.

Jan 31, 2017 5:40 PM EST









SHAREHOLDER ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Announces An Investigation Into Whether The Sale Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. To Eli Lilly & Co. For $46.50 Per Share Is Fair To Shareholders -- CLCD


Jan 31, 2017 4:38 PM EST









INVESTOR ALERT: Brower Piven Commences An Investigation Into The Proposed Sale Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. And Encourages Shareholders To Contact The Firm For Additional Information
The securities litigation law firm of Brower Piven, A Professional Corporation, has commenced an investigation into possible breaches of fiduciary duty and other violations of state law by the Board of Directors of CoLucid...

Jan 30, 2017 5:19 PM EST









INVESTOR ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Announces An Investigation Concerning Whether The Sale Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. To Eli Lilly & Co. For $46.50 Per Share Is Fair To Shareholders -- CLCD
The following statement is being issued by Levi & Korsinsky, LLP: To: All Persons or Entities who purchased CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

Jan 27, 2017 11:21 AM EST













SHAREHOLDER ALERT: Brower Piven Commences An Investigation Into The Proposed Sale Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. And Encourages Investors To Contact The Firm For Additional Information
The securities litigation law firm of Brower Piven, A Professional Corporation, has commenced an investigation into possible breaches of fiduciary duty and other violations of state law by the Board of Directors of CoLucid...

Jan 23, 2017 3:34 PM EST













Robbins Arroyo LLP: Acquisition Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (CLCD) By Eli Lilly And Company (LLY) May Not Be In Shareholders' Best Interests
Shareholder rights attorneys at Robbins Arroyo LLP are investigating the proposed acquisition of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

Jan 19, 2017 3:54 PM EST













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Reaches Analyst Target Price
In recent trading, shares of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Inc have crossed above the average analyst 12-month target price of $42.50, changing hands for $46.25/share. When a stock reaches the target an analyst has set, the analyst logically has two ways to react: downgrade on valuation, or, re-adjust their target price to a higher level.

Jan 19, 2017 9:26 AM EST













Stocks Hold Mixed as Fed's Yellen Forecasts Series of Rate Hikes
Stocks hold mixed on Wednesday afternoon as Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen caps off a day filled with interest rate speculation.

Jan 18, 2017 2:33 PM EST













Must-Know Tricks On Trading Goldman Sachs, Ford and Other Very Active Stocks
Here's how to trade some of the most active stocks on the market Wednesday.

Jan 18, 2017 1:47 PM EST













COLUCID PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. SHAREHOLDER ALERT: Former SEC Attorney Willie Briscoe Believes The Acquisition By Eli Lilly And Company May Be Unfair To Shareholders
Former United States Securities and Exchange Commission attorney Willie Briscoe is investigating potential claims against the Board of Directors of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

Jan 18, 2017 12:46 PM EST













COLUCID PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. SHAREHOLDER ALERT: Rigrodsky & Long, P.A. Announces Investigation Of Buyout
Rigrodsky & Long, P.A.

Jan 18, 2017 12:01 PM EST













Stocks Struggle for Direction as Economic Improvements May Push Fed Moves
Stocks struggle for direction on Wednesday as a strengthening U.S. economy reinforces the chances of several rate hikes this year.

Jan 18, 2017 11:07 AM EST













Stock Futures Inch Higher as Citigroup, Goldman Sachs Get Trading Boost
Stock futures inch higher as Citigroup and Goldman Sachs join the series of banks that enjoyed a trading boost in the fourth quarter.

Jan 18, 2017 9:21 AM EST













Jazz Pharma, CoLucid Spike Premarket, Plus Other Biotech Movers
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals saw shares boost 32% ahead of the market open Wednesday.

Jan 18, 2017 9:13 AM EST













Eli Lilly Acquires CoLucid Pharma, Adds Migraine Drug to Pipeline
CoLucid will be acquired for $46.50 per share, a 33% premium to the stock's closing price Tuesday.

Jan 18, 2017 7:53 AM EST













Lilly And CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Announce Agreement For Lilly To Acquire CoLucid


Jan 18, 2017 6:45 AM EST













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals To Present At The 28th Annual Piper Jaffray Healthcare Conference


Nov 28, 2016 1:59 PM EST









Airline Stocks Get Airborne
I bought ProShares Ultra QQQ Trust in the premarket and sold in the first hour of trading for a profit.

Nov 15, 2016 5:16 PM EST













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Provides SPARTAN Enrollment Update


Nov 14, 2016 8:00 AM EST













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Announces 2016 Third Quarter Results And Corporate Highlights


Nov 9, 2016 8:00 AM EST













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals To Present At The Stifel 2016 Healthcare Conference


Nov 8, 2016 8:00 AM EST













Why These 4 Little-Known Stocks Have Outgunned the DJIA This Year
These four stocks have soared in 2016. Here are the reasons and a look at whether there is still time to jump aboard.

Oct 20, 2016 4:15 PM EDT













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Announces Additional Analyses Of Lasmiditan's Onset Of Action Data From SAMURAI And Supporting Non-Clinical Data
Non-Clinical Data and Posters Presented at 5th European Headache and Migraine Trust International Congress

Oct 5, 2016 10:54 AM EDT













4 Stocks with Strong Technicals to Buy Now
Here are four stocks with strong technicals that look poised for more upside.

Sep 29, 2016 2:07 PM EDT













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals To Present At The Ladenburg Thalmann 2016 Healthcare Conference


Sep 26, 2016 7:00 AM EDT













CORRECTING And REPLACING - CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Provides Interim Update On GLADIATOR


Sep 19, 2016 10:43 AM EDT













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Provides Interim Update On GLADIATOR


Sep 19, 2016 7:00 AM EDT













CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Announces Achievement Of Secondary Endpoints In SAMURAI


Sep 17, 2016 5:30 AM EDT



















Next






Load More








From Our Partners



First-Quarter Deal Making Shows Glimmers Of Growth

SeekingAlpha



Oh, Snap - A Blowout IPO

SeekingAlpha



Lilly completes CoLucid buy

SeekingAlpha



GE Breaks Up

SeekingAlpha



A Fearless Market

SeekingAlpha



Biotechnology: Off To New Highs

SeekingAlpha



Buffett's Big Trump Era Bet

SeekingAlpha



Biotechnology: Can Trump Be A Catalyst?

SeekingAlpha



Premarket analyst action - healthcare

SeekingAlpha



CoLucid Pharmaceuticals downgraded to Equal Weight from Overweight at Barclays

The Fly



Snippet Roundup: Opdivo's First-Line Lung Combo Delay And Colucid's Lilly Windfall

SeekingAlpha



Eli Lilly: How Does The CoLucid Deal Impact The Stock?

SeekingAlpha



Pre-Market Most Active for Jan 18, 2017 :  CLCD, AZN, TEP, VALE, BAC, TTM, C, TVIX, QQQ, YHOO, XIV, EBAY

NASDAQ



Midday Gainers / Losers

SeekingAlpha



How To Play Trump - 6 Stocks For The Next 4 Years

SeekingAlpha


































 











Trending


FTC Seen as Set to Block Rite Aid Deal


15 Foods to Avoid if You Have High Cholesterol


It Would Be 'Crazy' to Clean House at Wells Fargo, CEO Says


McDonald's Has a Restaurant in Poland That Looks Like the Future of the Golden Arches


Amazon's Earnings Miss, but Nothing Can Stop AWS











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 













  CLCD Stock Quote - CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  CoLucid Pharmaceuticals Inc   CLCD:US      Acquired   CLCD:US was acquired by LLY:US   USD             Volume   0    52Wk Range   7.41 - 46.65                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    52Wk Range   7.41 - 46.65    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -3.44    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding  (m)   19.247    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector Health Care   % Price Change -0.68%     Industry Pharmaceuticals, Biotechnology & Life Sciences   % Price Change -0.43%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases    1/18/2017   Stocks Mixed as Fed's 'Beige Book' Touts Modest U.S. Growth  - The Street     1/18/2017   Stocks Mixed as Fed's 'Beige Book' Touts Modest U.S. Growth  - The Street     1/18/2017   Stocks Sink Into the Red in Choppy Trading Ahead of Beige Book, Yellen  - The Street     1/18/2017   Stocks Mixed as U.S. Economy's Strength Supports Rate Hikes in 2017  - The Street     1/18/2017   Stocks Fluctuate as U.S. Economy's Strength Supports Rate Hikes in 2017  - The Street    There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     5/16/2017   AVEO Announces Appointment of Matthew Dallas as Chief Financial Officer     3/1/2017   Lilly Completes Acquisition of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals     3/1/2017   Lilly Completes Acquisition of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals     2/2/2017   INVESTOR ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Announces an Investigation Concerning Whether the Sale of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. to     1/31/2017   Bragar Eagel & Squire, P.C. Is Investigating the Board of Directors of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (CLCD) on Behalf of     1/31/2017   SHAREHOLDER ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Announces an Investigation Into Whether the Sale of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. to     1/30/2017   INVESTOR ALERT: Brower Piven Commences An Investigation Into The Proposed Sale Of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. And Encourages    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. provides pharmaceutical products. The Company develops oral lasmiditan for the treatment of migraine headache and intravenous lasmiditan for treatment of headache pain.    Address  PO Box 425227Cambridge, MA 02142United States   Phone  1-781-365-2596   Website   www.colucid.com     Executives Board Members      Arthur M Pappas "Art"   Founder    Thomas P Mathers "Tom"  President/CEO      Linda C Hogan   VP:Business Development      Daniel L Boeglin "Dan"   Outside General Counsel    Bernice Kuca  Head:Clinical & Regulatory Ops     Show More         


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - IPO Candy






































 Skip to primary navigation Skip to content 



BecomeaMember





 


IPO CandyEveryone's favorite site for IPO insights and analysis.Main navigationHome » CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
01/20/2016 by   CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company, develops small molecule for the acute treatment of migraine headaches. Its lead product candidate is Lasmiditan, an oral tablet that is in a Phase III clinical program for the acute treatment of migraine headaches in adults. The company also develops IV lasmiditan, which is Phase II clinical trial for the acute treatment of unspecified headache pain in adults in emergency room and other urgent care settings. CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. was founded in 2005 and is headquartered in Burlington, Massachusetts.
 


CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.


CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company, develops small molecule for the acute treatment of migraine headaches. Its lead product candidate is Lasmiditan, an oral tablet that is in a Phase III clinical program for the acute treatment of migraine headaches in adults. The company also develops IV lasmiditan, which is Phase II clinical trial for the acute treatment of unspecified headache pain in adults in emergency room and other urgent care settings. CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. was founded in 2005 and is headquartered in Burlington, Massachusetts.

Twitter
Facebook
Google+
LinkedIn




CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.<p>CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company, develops small molecule for the acute treatment of migraine headaches. Its lead product candidate is Lasmiditan, an oral tablet that is in a Phase III clinical program for the acute treatment of migraine headaches in adults. The company also develops IV lasmiditan, which is Phase II clinical trial for the acute treatment of unspecified headache pain in adults in emergency room and other urgent care settings. CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. was founded in 2005 and is headquartered in Burlington, Massachusetts.</p>
MAUnited StatesPhone: 781-365-2596




CLCD


                Small molecule drugs
            

Documents
Roadshow



Main CategoryHealthcare
CategoriesDrugs


Contact


        http://www.colucid.com
    
781-365-2596
    








Address15 New England Executive Park, Burlington, Massachusetts, 01803, United States
            





 









We love IPOs
The IPO market provides a magical window into the most exciting technologies, emerging consumer trends and important business developments - all testing their mettle in the crucible of the public markets. We are constantly learning and researching to deliver the best insights available.










We are independent
We have no vested interests driving our work. All the investment banks and brokers on a deal are paid to do a sales and marketing job. Our job is to remain objective and use a fact-based approach to evaluate the potential for an IPO.










We get the best ratings
IPO Candy has been recognized since 2009 as the single best place to get commentary, analysis and assets in the IPO market. The most common write-in comment we get from users is that they "love what we do."










We share everything we know
With three decades of research under our belt we want to share what we have learned and the best practices we have discovered. Our IPO University contains texts, videos and resources to share our process and help everyone develop their skills.






Become an IPOCandy Member
Enjoy the benefits of full access to our content including access to IPO roadshow slideshows and transcripts included in our posts. Members also get additional insights via email, receive our monthly Candygram and have access to our IPO calendar.
Become a Member






























CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015 Trends, Statistics, Segment and Forecasts, Market Size, Share Analysis : Market Research Store



















+49 322 210 92714
                                    (GMT OFFICE HOURS)
                                

+1-855-465-4651
                                    (US/CAN TOLL FREE)
                                

+1-386-310-3803
                                    (US OFFICE NO)
                                
































Home
Categories
Become Publisher
News
About Us
Contact Us



























-Select Category-
Consumer Goods
Food & Beverage
Heavy Industry
Life Sciences
Marketing & Market Research
Public Sector
Service Industries
Technology & Media
Semiconductor
Chemical and Materials
Metallurgical
Market Research




Search












Home >> Life Sciences >> Pharmaceuticals


CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015



Published: May-2015 | Format: PDF | Global Markets Direct | Number of pages: 25 | Code: MRS - 22270



Report Details
Table Of Content
Inquiry For Buying
Request Sample



CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015

Summary

Global Markets Direct’s, ‘CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2015’, provides an overview of the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s pharmaceutical research and development focus.

This report provides comprehensive information on the current therapeutic developmental pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s, complete with comparative analysis at various stages, therapeutics assessment by drug target, mechanism of action (MoA), route of administration (RoA) and molecule type. It also reviews latest updates, and featured news and press releases, along with special features on late-stage and discontinued projects.

Global Markets Direct’s report features investigational drugs from across globe covering over 20 therapy areas and nearly 3,000 indications. The report is built using data and information sourced from Global Markets Direct’s proprietary databases, Company/University websites, SEC filings, investor presentations and featured press releases from company/university sites and industry-specific third party sources, put together by Global Markets Direct’s team. Drug profiles/records featured in the report undergoes periodic updation following a stringent set of processes that ensures that all the profiles are updated with the latest set of information. Additionally, processes including live news & deals tracking, browser based alert-box and clinical trials registries tracking ensure that the most recent developments are captured on a real time basis.

The report enhances decision making capabilities and help to create effective counter strategies to gain competitive advantage. It strengthens R&D pipelines by identifying new targets and MOAs to produce first-in-class and best-in-class products.

Note*: Certain sections in the report may be removed or altered based on the availability and relevance of data for the indicated disease.

Scope

- The report provides brief overview of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. including business description, key information and facts, and its locations and subsidiaries
- The report reviews current pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s human therapeutic division and enlists all their major and minor projects
- The report features product description and descriptive mechanism of action for key pipeline products along with the product’s developmental history and major milestones 
- Special feature on out-licensed and partnered product portfolio
- The report summarizes all the dormant and discontinued pipeline projects
- Latest company statement 
- Latest news and deals relating to the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s pipeline products

Reasons to buy

- Evaluate CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s strategic position with total access to detailed information on its product pipeline
- Assess the growth potential of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. in its therapy areas of focus
- Identify new drug targets and therapeutic classes in the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s R&D portfolio and develop key strategic initiatives to reinforce pipeline in those areas
- Exploit in-licensing opportunities by identifying windows of opportunity to fill portfolio gaps
- Develop strategic initiatives by understanding the focus areas of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and exploit collaboration and partnership opportunities
- Identify emerging players with potentially strong product portfolio and create effective counter-strategies to gain competitive advantage
- Plan mergers and acquisitions effectively by identifying the most promising pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
- Develop and design in-licensing and out-licensing strategies by identifying prospective partners with the most attractive projects to enhance and expand business potential and scope
- Explore the dormant and discontinued projects of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and identify potential opportunities in those areas
- Avoid Intellectual Property Rights related issues


Table of Contents
Table of Contents 2
List of Tables 3
List of Figures 3
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Snapshot 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Overview 4
Key Information 4
Key Facts 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Research and Development Overview 5
Key Therapeutic Areas 5
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Review 7
Pipeline Products by Stage of Development 7
Pipeline Products - Monotherapy 8
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products Glance 9
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Late Stage Pipeline Products 9
Phase III Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 9
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Clinical Stage Pipeline Products 10
Phase II Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 10
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Early Stage Pipeline Products 11
Preclinical Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 11
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Drug Profiles 12
lasmiditan succinate 12
Product Description 12
Mechanism of Action 12
R&D Progress 12
COL-204 14
Product Description 14
Mechanism of Action 14
R&D Progress 14
Conjugated Stigmine Program 15
Product Description 15
Mechanism of Action 15
R&D Progress 15
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Analysis 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Target 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Route of Administration 17
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Molecule Type 18
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action 19
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates 20
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Projects 22
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Locations And Subsidiaries 23
Head Office 23
Appendix 24
Methodology 24
Coverage 24
Secondary Research 24
Primary Research 24
Expert Panel Validation 24
Contact Us 24
Disclaimer 25 
List of Tables
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Information 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Facts 4
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Indication, 2015 6
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 7
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 8
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase III, 2015 9
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase II, 2015 10
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Preclinical, 2015 11
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Target, 2015 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Route of Administration, 2015 17
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Molecule Type, 2015 18
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action, 2015 19
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates, 2015 20
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Dormant Developmental Projects,2015 22 
List of Figures
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Indication, 2015 6
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2015 7
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2015 8
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Target, 2015 16
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Route of Administration, 2015 17
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Molecule Type, 2015 18
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Top 10 Mechanism of Action, 2015 19 

Inquiry For Buying

Please fill your details below, to inquire about this report:
* Indicates required fields






 





Name:






Email:






Phone:






Name of company:






Title/Designation:






Country Name:

-Select Country-
ANDORRA
UNITED ARAB EMIRATES
AFGHANISTAN
ANTIGUA AND BARBUDA
ANGUILLA
ALBANIA
ARMENIA
ANGOLA
ANTARCTICA
ARGENTINA
AMERICAN SAMOA
AUSTRIA
AUSTRALIA
ARUBA
ÅLAND ISLANDS
AZERBAIJAN
BOSNIA AND HERZEGOVINA
BARBADOS
BANGLADESH
BELGIUM
BURKINA FASO
BULGARIA
BAHRAIN
BURUNDI
BENIN
SAINT BARTHÉLEMY
BERMUDA
BRUNEI DARUSSALAM
BOLIVIA, PLURINATIONAL STATE OF
BONAIRE, SINT EUSTATIUS AND SABA
BRAZIL
BAHAMAS
BHUTAN
BOUVET ISLAND
BOTSWANA
BELARUS
BELIZE
CANADA
COCOS (KEELING) ISLANDS
CONGO, THE DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC OF THE
CENTRAL AFRICAN REPUBLIC
CONGO
SWITZERLAND
CÔTE D'IVOIRE
COOK ISLANDS
CHILE
CAMEROON
CHINA
COLOMBIA
COSTA RICA
CUBA
CAPE VERDE
CURAÇAO
CHRISTMAS ISLAND
CYPRUS
CZECH REPUBLIC
GERMANY
DJIBOUTI
DENMARK
DOMINICA
DOMINICAN REPUBLIC
ALGERIA
ECUADOR
ESTONIA
EGYPT
WESTERN SAHARA
ERITREA
SPAIN
ETHIOPIA
FINLAND
FIJI
FALKLAND ISLANDS (MALVINAS)
MICRONESIA, FEDERATED STATES OF
FAROE ISLANDS
FRANCE
GABON
UNITED KINGDOM
GRENADA
GEORGIA
FRENCH GUIANA
GUERNSEY
GHANA
GIBRALTAR
GREENLAND
GAMBIA
GUINEA
GUADELOUPE
EQUATORIAL GUINEA
GREECE
SOUTH GEORGIA AND THE SOUTH SANDWICH ISLANDS
GUATEMALA
GUAM
GUINEA-BISSAU
GUYANA
HONG KONG
HEARD ISLAND AND MCDONALD ISLANDS
HONDURAS
CROATIA
HAITI
HUNGARY
INDONESIA
IRELAND
ISRAEL
ISLE OF MAN
INDIA
BRITISH INDIAN OCEAN TERRITORY
IRAQ
IRAN, ISLAMIC REPUBLIC OF
ICELAND
ITALY
JERSEY
JAMAICA
JORDAN
JAPAN
KENYA
KYRGYZSTAN
CAMBODIA
KIRIBATI
COMOROS
SAINT KITTS AND NEVIS
KOREA, DEMOCRATIC PEOPLE'S REPUBLIC OF
KOREA, REPUBLIC OF
KUWAIT
CAYMAN ISLANDS
KAZAKHSTAN
LAO PEOPLE'S DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC
LEBANON
SAINT LUCIA
LIECHTENSTEIN
SRI LANKA
LIBERIA
LESOTHO
LITHUANIA
LUXEMBOURG
LATVIA
LIBYA
MOROCCO
MONACO
MOLDOVA, REPUBLIC OF
MONTENEGRO
SAINT MARTIN (FRENCH PART)
MADAGASCAR
MARSHALL ISLANDS
MACEDONIA, THE FORMER YUGOSLAV REPUBLIC OF
MALI
MYANMAR
MONGOLIA
MACAO
NORTHERN MARIANA ISLANDS
MARTINIQUE
MAURITANIA
MONTSERRAT
MALTA
MAURITIUS
MALDIVES
MALAWI
MEXICO
MALAYSIA
MOZAMBIQUE
NAMIBIA
NEW CALEDONIA
NIGER
NORFOLK ISLAND
NIGERIA
NICARAGUA
NETHERLANDS
NORWAY
NEPAL
NAURU
NIUE
NEW ZEALAND
OMAN
PANAMA
PERU
FRENCH POLYNESIA
PAPUA NEW GUINEA
PHILIPPINES
PAKISTAN
POLAND
SAINT PIERRE AND MIQUELON
PITCAIRN
PUERTO RICO
PALESTINIAN, STATE OF
PORTUGAL
PALAU
PARAGUAY
QATAR
RÉUNION
ROMANIA
SERBIA
RUSSIAN FEDERATION
RWANDA
SAUDI ARABIA
SOLOMON ISLANDS
SEYCHELLES
SUDAN
SWEDEN
SINGAPORE
SAINT HELENA, ASCENSION AND TRISTAN DA CUNHA
SLOVENIA
SVALBARD AND JAN MAYEN
SLOVAKIA
SIERRA LEONE
SAN MARINO
SENEGAL
SOMALIA
SURINAME
SOUTH SUDAN
SAO TOME AND PRINCIPE
EL SALVADOR
SINT MAARTEN (DUTCH PART)
SYRIAN ARAB REPUBLIC
SWAZILAND
TURKS AND CAICOS ISLANDS
CHAD
FRENCH SOUTHERN TERRITORIES
TOGO
THAILAND
TAJIKISTAN
TOKELAU
TIMOR-LESTE
TURKMENISTAN
TUNISIA
TONGA
TURKEY
TRINIDAD AND TOBAGO
TUVALU
TAIWAN, PROVINCE OF CHINA
TANZANIA, UNITED REPUBLIC OF
UKRAINE
UGANDA
UNITED STATES MINOR OUTLYING ISLANDS
UNITED STATES
URUGUAY
UZBEKISTAN
HOLY SEE (VATICAN CITY STATE)
SAINT VINCENT AND THE GRENADINES
VENEZUELA, BOLIVARIAN REPUBLIC OF
VIRGIN ISLANDS, BRITISH
VIRGIN ISLANDS, U.S.
VIET NAM
VANUATU
WALLIS AND FUTUNA
SAMOA
YEMEN
MAYOTTE
SOUTH AFRICA
ZAMBIA
ZIMBABWE





How can we help you?











Refresh



captcha:





 


Submit







Request Sample

Please fill your details below, to receive sample report:
* Indicates required fields






 





Name:






Email:






Phone:






Name of company:






Title/Designation:






Country Name:

-Select Country-
ANDORRA
UNITED ARAB EMIRATES
AFGHANISTAN
ANTIGUA AND BARBUDA
ANGUILLA
ALBANIA
ARMENIA
ANGOLA
ANTARCTICA
ARGENTINA
AMERICAN SAMOA
AUSTRIA
AUSTRALIA
ARUBA
ÅLAND ISLANDS
AZERBAIJAN
BOSNIA AND HERZEGOVINA
BARBADOS
BANGLADESH
BELGIUM
BURKINA FASO
BULGARIA
BAHRAIN
BURUNDI
BENIN
SAINT BARTHÉLEMY
BERMUDA
BRUNEI DARUSSALAM
BOLIVIA, PLURINATIONAL STATE OF
BONAIRE, SINT EUSTATIUS AND SABA
BRAZIL
BAHAMAS
BHUTAN
BOUVET ISLAND
BOTSWANA
BELARUS
BELIZE
CANADA
COCOS (KEELING) ISLANDS
CONGO, THE DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC OF THE
CENTRAL AFRICAN REPUBLIC
CONGO
SWITZERLAND
CÔTE D'IVOIRE
COOK ISLANDS
CHILE
CAMEROON
CHINA
COLOMBIA
COSTA RICA
CUBA
CAPE VERDE
CURAÇAO
CHRISTMAS ISLAND
CYPRUS
CZECH REPUBLIC
GERMANY
DJIBOUTI
DENMARK
DOMINICA
DOMINICAN REPUBLIC
ALGERIA
ECUADOR
ESTONIA
EGYPT
WESTERN SAHARA
ERITREA
SPAIN
ETHIOPIA
FINLAND
FIJI
FALKLAND ISLANDS (MALVINAS)
MICRONESIA, FEDERATED STATES OF
FAROE ISLANDS
FRANCE
GABON
UNITED KINGDOM
GRENADA
GEORGIA
FRENCH GUIANA
GUERNSEY
GHANA
GIBRALTAR
GREENLAND
GAMBIA
GUINEA
GUADELOUPE
EQUATORIAL GUINEA
GREECE
SOUTH GEORGIA AND THE SOUTH SANDWICH ISLANDS
GUATEMALA
GUAM
GUINEA-BISSAU
GUYANA
HONG KONG
HEARD ISLAND AND MCDONALD ISLANDS
HONDURAS
CROATIA
HAITI
HUNGARY
INDONESIA
IRELAND
ISRAEL
ISLE OF MAN
INDIA
BRITISH INDIAN OCEAN TERRITORY
IRAQ
IRAN, ISLAMIC REPUBLIC OF
ICELAND
ITALY
JERSEY
JAMAICA
JORDAN
JAPAN
KENYA
KYRGYZSTAN
CAMBODIA
KIRIBATI
COMOROS
SAINT KITTS AND NEVIS
KOREA, DEMOCRATIC PEOPLE'S REPUBLIC OF
KOREA, REPUBLIC OF
KUWAIT
CAYMAN ISLANDS
KAZAKHSTAN
LAO PEOPLE'S DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC
LEBANON
SAINT LUCIA
LIECHTENSTEIN
SRI LANKA
LIBERIA
LESOTHO
LITHUANIA
LUXEMBOURG
LATVIA
LIBYA
MOROCCO
MONACO
MOLDOVA, REPUBLIC OF
MONTENEGRO
SAINT MARTIN (FRENCH PART)
MADAGASCAR
MARSHALL ISLANDS
MACEDONIA, THE FORMER YUGOSLAV REPUBLIC OF
MALI
MYANMAR
MONGOLIA
MACAO
NORTHERN MARIANA ISLANDS
MARTINIQUE
MAURITANIA
MONTSERRAT
MALTA
MAURITIUS
MALDIVES
MALAWI
MEXICO
MALAYSIA
MOZAMBIQUE
NAMIBIA
NEW CALEDONIA
NIGER
NORFOLK ISLAND
NIGERIA
NICARAGUA
NETHERLANDS
NORWAY
NEPAL
NAURU
NIUE
NEW ZEALAND
OMAN
PANAMA
PERU
FRENCH POLYNESIA
PAPUA NEW GUINEA
PHILIPPINES
PAKISTAN
POLAND
SAINT PIERRE AND MIQUELON
PITCAIRN
PUERTO RICO
PALESTINIAN, STATE OF
PORTUGAL
PALAU
PARAGUAY
QATAR
RÉUNION
ROMANIA
SERBIA
RUSSIAN FEDERATION
RWANDA
SAUDI ARABIA
SOLOMON ISLANDS
SEYCHELLES
SUDAN
SWEDEN
SINGAPORE
SAINT HELENA, ASCENSION AND TRISTAN DA CUNHA
SLOVENIA
SVALBARD AND JAN MAYEN
SLOVAKIA
SIERRA LEONE
SAN MARINO
SENEGAL
SOMALIA
SURINAME
SOUTH SUDAN
SAO TOME AND PRINCIPE
EL SALVADOR
SINT MAARTEN (DUTCH PART)
SYRIAN ARAB REPUBLIC
SWAZILAND
TURKS AND CAICOS ISLANDS
CHAD
FRENCH SOUTHERN TERRITORIES
TOGO
THAILAND
TAJIKISTAN
TOKELAU
TIMOR-LESTE
TURKMENISTAN
TUNISIA
TONGA
TURKEY
TRINIDAD AND TOBAGO
TUVALU
TAIWAN, PROVINCE OF CHINA
TANZANIA, UNITED REPUBLIC OF
UKRAINE
UGANDA
UNITED STATES MINOR OUTLYING ISLANDS
UNITED STATES
URUGUAY
UZBEKISTAN
HOLY SEE (VATICAN CITY STATE)
SAINT VINCENT AND THE GRENADINES
VENEZUELA, BOLIVARIAN REPUBLIC OF
VIRGIN ISLANDS, BRITISH
VIRGIN ISLANDS, U.S.
VIET NAM
VANUATU
WALLIS AND FUTUNA
SAMOA
YEMEN
MAYOTTE
SOUTH AFRICA
ZAMBIA
ZIMBABWE





How can we help you?











Refresh



captcha:





 


Submit











Related Reports


Global Bacterial Vaginosis Drug Market Rport 2017

Jun-2017 | BisReport  | Pages : 134 | Code : MRS-152720 | 2350
                    
Global Bacterial Vaginosis Drug Market Report 2017 Full Report: 2350 Multi License (Section): 4700 Section Price: As below Page: 115 Chart and Figure: 124 Publisher: BisReport Delivery Time: 24 hour Contact: sales@bisreport.com Phone: +86-18701006088 With the slowdown in world economic growth, the Bacterial Vaginosis Drug industry has also suffered a certain impact, but still maintained a relatively optimistic growth, the past four years, Bacterial Vaginosis Drug market size to maintain  Read more




Global Alzheimer's Disease Drug Market Rport 2017

Jun-2017 | BisReport  | Pages : 127 | Code : MRS-152719 | 2350
                    
Global Alzheimer’s Disease Drug Market Report 2017 Full Report: 2350 Multi License (Section): 4700 Section Price: As below Page: 115 Chart and Figure: 124 Publisher: BisReport Delivery Time: 24 hour Contact: sales@bisreport.com Phone: +86-18701006088 With the slowdown in world economic growth, the Alzheimer’s Disease Drug industry has also suffered a certain impact, but still maintained a relatively optimistic growth, the past four years, Alzheimer’s Disease Drug market size to maintain  Read more




Global Protein Powder Detailed Analysis Report 2017-2022

Jul-2017 | Detailed Analysis Research | Pages : 153 | Code : MRS-152586 | 3250
                    
This report mainly introduces volume and value market share by players, by regions, by product type, by consumers and also their price change details. As a Detailed Analysis report, it covers all details inside analysis and opinion in Protein Powder industry. This report splits Protein Powder market Price, Size, First Speciality, Second Speciality, Protein Powder Flavors, which covers the history data information from 2012 to 2016 and forecast from 2017 to 2022. This report focus Glob Read more




Opioid-Induced Constipation (OIC) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017

Jul-2017 | Global Markets Direct | Pages : 63 | Code : MRS-152442 | 2000
                    
Opioid-Induced Constipation (OIC) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017 Summary Global Markets Direct's latest Pharmaceutical and Healthcare disease pipeline guide Opioid-Induced Constipation (OIC) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017, provides an overview of the Opioid-Induced Constipation (OIC) (Toxicology) pipeline landscape. Opioids are effective pain relievers, but often have the side effect of constipation. These medicines affect the gastrointestinal tract in a variety of ways. Opioids increase the amo Read more




Chemotherapy Induced Neutropenia - Pipeline Review, H2 2017

Jul-2017 | Global Markets Direct | Pages : 120 | Code : MRS-152441 | 2000
                    
Chemotherapy Induced Neutropenia - Pipeline Review, H2 2017 Summary Global Markets Direct's latest Pharmaceutical and Healthcare disease pipeline guide Chemotherapy Induced Neutropenia - Pipeline Review, H2 2017, provides an overview of the Chemotherapy Induced Neutropenia (Toxicology) pipeline landscape. Chemotherapy-induced neutropenia is a very common side effect of cancer treatment. Symptoms include severe fatigue, weakness, anxiety, lack of energy, shortness of breath, headaches, pa Read more




Chemotherapy Induced Nausea and Vomiting - Pipeline Review, H2 2017

Jul-2017 | Global Markets Direct | Pages : 98 | Code : MRS-152440 | 2000
                    
Chemotherapy Induced Nausea and Vomiting - Pipeline Review, H2 2017 Summary Global Markets Direct's latest Pharmaceutical and Healthcare disease pipeline guide Chemotherapy Induced Nausea and Vomiting - Pipeline Review, H2 2017, provides an overview of the Chemotherapy Induced Nausea and Vomiting (Toxicology) pipeline landscape. Chemotherapy induced nausea and vomiting or CINV is nausea and vomiting that results specifically from treatment with chemotherapy drugs. Symptoms include a rapi Read more




P2X Purinoceptor 7 (P2Z Receptor or P2RX7) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017

Jul-2017 | Global Markets Direct | Pages : 39 | Code : MRS-152439 | 3500
                    
P2X Purinoceptor 7 (P2Z Receptor or P2RX7) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017 Summary According to the recently published report 'P2X Purinoceptor 7 - Pipeline Review, H2 2017'; P2X Purinoceptor 7 (P2Z Receptor or P2RX7) pipeline Target constitutes close to 9 molecules. Out of which approximately 9 molecules are developed by Companies. P2X Purinoceptor 7 (P2Z Receptor or P2RX7) - P2X purinoceptor 7 is a protein encoded by the P2RX7 gene. It acts as receptor for ATP that acts as a ligand-gated i Read more




Smoothened Homolog (Protein Gx or SMO) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017

Jul-2017 | Global Markets Direct | Pages : 72 | Code : MRS-152438 | 3500
                    
Smoothened Homolog (Protein Gx or SMO) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017 Summary Smoothened Homolog (Protein Gx or SMO) - Smoothened homolog (SMO) is a G protein-coupled receptor that probably associates with the patched protein (PTCH) to transduce the hedgehog's proteins signal. Binding of sonic hedgehog (SHH) to its receptor is thought to prevent normal inhibition by patched of smoothened (SMO). It is required for the accumulation of KIF7 and GLI3 in the cilia. Smoothened Homolog (Protein Gx Read more




Metabotropic Glutamate Receptor 4 (GPRC1D or MGLUR4 or GRM4) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017

Jul-2017 | Global Markets Direct | Pages : 39 | Code : MRS-152437 | 3500
                    
Metabotropic Glutamate Receptor 4 (GPRC1D or MGLUR4 or GRM4) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017 Summary Metabotropic Glutamate Receptor 4 (GPRC1D or MGLUR4 or GRM4) pipeline Target constitutes close to 6 molecules. Out of which approximately 5 molecules are developed by companies and remaining by the universities/institutes. The latest report Metabotropic Glutamate Receptor 4 - Pipeline Review, H2 2017, outlays comprehensive information on the Metabotropic Glutamate Receptor 4 (GPRC1D or MGLUR4 o Read more




G Protein Coupled Bile Acid Receptor 1 (G Protein Coupled Receptor GPCR19 or Membrane Type Receptor For Bile Acids or hBG37 or GPR131 or GPBAR1) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017

Jul-2017 | Global Markets Direct | Pages : 34 | Code : MRS-152436 | 3500
                    
G Protein Coupled Bile Acid Receptor 1 (G Protein Coupled Receptor GPCR19 or Membrane Type Receptor For Bile Acids or hBG37 or GPR131 or GPBAR1) - Pipeline Review, H2 2017 Summary According to the recently published report 'G Protein Coupled Bile Acid Receptor 1 - Pipeline Review, H2 2017'; G Protein Coupled Bile Acid Receptor 1 (G Protein Coupled Receptor GPCR19 or Membrane Type Receptor For Bile Acids or hBG37 or GPR131 or GPBAR1) pipeline Target constitutes close to 8 molecules. Out of Read more








Payment Mode




Single User  | $(USD)1500








Multi User | $(USD)3000








Corporate User  | $(USD)4500













Latest Report


2017 Global Non-Slip Epoxy Glass Flake Paint Market Research Report


2017 Global Parking Sensors Market Research Report


2017 Global Nitrogen Oxide Sensor Market Research Report


2017 Global Nuclear Density Gauge Market Research Report


2017 Global Automotive Interior Materials Market Research Report

View More



Latest News


Global Chitosan Market Set for Rapid Growth, To Reach USD 4.74 Billion by 2021

Zion Market Research has published a new report titled Chitosan Market for Water Treatment, Biomed



Development of e-commerce to Reshape Global Mobile Hotspot Router Market

Mobile hotspot is a popular feature on smart phones that provide wireless internet access on many 



Global Carotenoids Market Is Expected To Reach Around USD 1.52 Billion in 2021

Zion Market Research has published a new report titled Carotenoids Market by Type (Astaxanthin, Be



Soaring Demand from Food & Beverages Industry to Act as Prime Driving for Ascorbic Acid Market, Reports Zion Market Research

Ascorbic acid is extensively available in nature, mostly rich in leafy vegetables and fresh fruits



Global Energy Management System (EMS) Market Is Set for a Rapid Growth and is Expected to Reach USD 63,161.5 million by 2021

Zion Market Research has published a new report titled Energy Management System Market (EMS) by So


View More














Single User | $(USD)1500
View Pricing 













Find Help

How to Order
Disclaimer 
FAQs
Return Policy
Sitemap



Our Company

About Us
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy



We accept the following payment methods






© 2016 - 2017 Market Research Store - Market Research Reports 
















CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2014























































  info@wiseguyreports.com  |   
 Chat with us   |    +1 (339) 368 6938 (US)  |     +44 208 133 9349 (UK) 



 Login    Register 






















Home


Report Categories







Premium Reports

Access to 600000+ Premium Reports











  
                                Aerospace & Defense
                              









  
                                Agri & Food
                              









  
                                Automotive
                              









  
                                Basic Materials
                              











  
                                Consumer Goods & Retail
                              









  
                                Energy
                              









  
                                Life Sciences
                              









  
                                Manufacturing & Construction
                              











  
                                Services
                              









  
                                Telecom & IT
                              









  
                                Education
                              









  
                                Security & Intelligence Systems
                              











  
                                Technology
                              









  
                                Company Reports
                              










Report Categories 










Aerospace & Defense
                





Agri & Food
                





Automotive
                





Basic Materials
                







Consumer Goods & Retail
                





Energy
                





Life Sciences
                





Manufacturing & Construction
                







Services
                





Telecom & IT
                





Education
                





Security & Intelligence Systems
                







Technology
                





Company Reports
                








Publisher
Knowledgestore

Countries 
              


Browse by Country
Browse by Continent
Browse by Group / Region



 Conferences
              


Upcoming Conferences
Seminars




 Conferences
              


Upcoming Conferences
Seminars




Countries 

Browse by Country
Browse by Continent
Browse by Group / Region



News & Blog

 Press Release
Blog



News & Blogs

 Press Release
Blogs


FAQs

About Us

About Our Company
Our Team
Life At WGR


Careers
Contact Us











                                         There are no items currently in your basket.
                                     













There are no items currently in your basket!














  




































Search 
                






 














Home
All Reports
CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review -...









 


  CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2014


WGR11357
31 
                  July, 2014 
Global
22 pages 
Global Markets Direct






















Description




Table of Content




Sample Report




Enquiry before buy




Related Reports





CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2014SummaryGlobal Markets Direct’s, ‘CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Product Pipeline Review - 2014’, provides an overview of the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s pharmaceutical research and development focus.This report provides comprehensive information on the current therapeutic developmental pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s, complete with comparative analysis at various stages, therapeutics assessment by drug target, mechanism of action (MoA), route of administration (RoA) and molecule type. It also reviews latest updates, and featured news and press releases, along with special features on late-stage and discontinued projects.Global Markets Direct’s report features investigational drugs from across globe covering over 20 therapy areas and nearly 3,000 indications. The report is built using data and information sourced from Global Markets Direct’s proprietary databases, Company/University websites, SEC filings, investor presentations and featured press releases from company/university sites and industry-specific third party sources, put together by Global Markets Direct’s team. Drug profiles/records featured in the report undergoes periodic updation following a stringent set of processes that ensures that all the profiles are updated with the latest set of information. Additionally, processes including live news & deals tracking, browser based alert-box and clinical trials registries tracking ensure that the most recent developments are captured on a real time basis.The report enhances decision making capabilities and help to create effective counter strategies to gain competitive advantage. It strengthens R&D pipelines by identifying new targets and MOAs to produce first-in-class and best-in-class products.Note*: Certain sections in the report may be removed or altered based on the availability and relevance of data for the indicated disease.Scope- The report provides brief overview of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. including business description, key information and facts, and its locations and subsidiaries- The report reviews current pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s human therapeutic division and enlists all their major and minor projects- The report features product description and descriptive mechanism of action for key pipeline products along with the product’s developmental history and major milestones - Special feature on out-licensed and partnered product portfolio- The report summarizes all the dormant and discontinued pipeline projects- Latest company statement - Latest news and deals relating to the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s pipeline productsReasons to buy- Evaluate CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s strategic position with total access to detailed information on its product pipeline- Assess the growth potential of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. in its therapy areas of focus- Identify new drug targets and therapeutic classes in the CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.’s R&D portfolio and develop key strategic initiatives to reinforce pipeline in those areas- Exploit in-licensing opportunities by identifying windows of opportunity to fill portfolio gaps- Develop strategic initiatives by understanding the focus areas of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and exploit collaboration and partnership opportunities- Identify emerging players with potentially strong product portfolio and create effective counter-strategies to gain competitive advantage- Plan mergers and acquisitions effectively by identifying the most promising pipeline of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc.- Develop and design in-licensing and out-licensing strategies by identifying prospective partners with the most attractive projects to enhance and expand business potential and scope- Explore the dormant and discontinued projects of CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and identify potential opportunities in those areas- Avoid Intellectual Property Rights related issues


Table of ContentsTable of Contents 2List of Tables 3List of Figures 3CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Snapshot 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Overview 4Key Information 4Key Facts 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Research and Development Overview 5Key Therapeutic Areas 5CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Review 7Pipeline Products by Stage of Development 7Pipeline Products - Monotherapy 8CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products Glance 9CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Clinical Stage Pipeline Products 9Phase II Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 9CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Early Stage Pipeline Products 10Preclinical Products/Combination Treatment Modalities 10CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Drug Profiles 11lasmiditan succinate 11Product Description 11Mechanism of Action 11R&D Progress 11COL-204 13Product Description 13Mechanism of Action 13R&D Progress 13Conjugated Stigmine Program 14Product Description 14Mechanism of Action 14R&D Progress 14CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Analysis 15CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Target 15CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Route of Administration 16CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Molecule Type 17CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action 18CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates 19CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Locations And Subsidiaries 20Head Office 20Appendix 21Methodology 21Coverage 21Secondary Research 21Primary Research 21Expert Panel Validation 21Contact Us 22Disclaimer 22List of TablesCoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Information 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Key Facts 4CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Indication, 2014 6CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2014 7CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2014 8CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Phase II, 2014 9CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Preclinical, 2014 10CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Target, 2014 15CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Route of Administration, 2014 16CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Molecule Type, 2014 17CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline Products by Mechanism of Action, 2014 18CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Recent Pipeline Updates, 2014 19List of FiguresCoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Indication, 2014 6CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Stage of Development, 2014 7CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Monotherapy Products in Pipeline, 2014 8CoLucid Pharmaceuticals, Inc. - Pipeline by Top 10 Route of Administration, 2014 16







                                Request a Sample Report
                                




Name:*










Email:*


(Optional: Request you to please fill in your Corporate Email-ID)



Job Title:*





Company:*





Phone No:*





Your Country:*

--select country--
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodja
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo-Brazzaville
Congo-Kinshasa
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d"Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland (Malvinas)
Faroes
Fiji
Finland
France
French-Guiana
Tahiti(French Polinesia)
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Vatican City
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
North Korea
South Korea
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macao
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Norfolk
Northern Mariana
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Helena
Saint Lucia
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
St Vincent & the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands British
Virgin Islands US
Wales
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Timor-Leste
Curacao
St Kitts & Nevis
Sint Maarten
Guernsey
Isle of Man
Jersey
Niue
Montenegro



Do you have any Specific field of Interest?*

















Confirm


 








Make an enquiry before buying this Report




Name:*










Email:*


(Optional: Request you to please fill in your Corporate Email-ID)



Job Title:*





Company:*





Phone No:*





Your Country:*

--select country--
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodja
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo-Brazzaville
Congo-Kinshasa
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d"Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland (Malvinas)
Faroes
Fiji
Finland
France
French-Guiana
Tahiti(French Polinesia)
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Vatican City
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
North Korea
South Korea
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macao
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Norfolk
Northern Mariana
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Helena
Saint Lucia
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
St Vincent & the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands British
Virgin Islands US
Wales
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Timor-Leste
Curacao
St Kitts & Nevis
Sint Maarten
Guernsey
Isle of Man
Jersey
Niue
Montenegro



Your Enquiry*

















Confirm


 
















Purchase this Market Research Report







 USD




 GBP




 EURO




 YEN




 INR







                        1-user PDF
                         
                          $1,500.00
                        

 
                        Site PDF 
                         
                          $3,000.00
                        

 
                        Enterprise PDF 
                         
                          $4,500.00
                        





  1-user PDF
  
 
    1,145.85
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  2,291.70
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  3,437.55
  





  1-user PDF
  
 
    1,280.85
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  2,561.70
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  3,842.55
  





  1-user PDF
  
 
    166,860.00
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  333,720.00
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  500,580.00
  





  1-user PDF
  
 
    96,248.25
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  192,496.50
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  288,744.75
  









Add To Cart
BUY NOW





 















  Email Report


  Sample Report




  Save Page


  Any Questions




  Download information


  Check Discount




  Download Order Form









  Email Report


  Sample Report




  Save Page


  Any Questions




  Download information


  Check Discount




  Download Order Form






Contact Us










Akash Anand
Domain Head Business Development
sales@wiseguyreports.com
+1 (646) 843 9312 (US)
+44 208 133 9349 (UK)













Rishabh Arora
Domain Head Business Development
sales@wiseguyreports.com
+44-208-133-9346













Abu Koshy
Domain Head Business Development
sales@wiseguyreports.com
+1 339 368 6938










Related Reports








                  ×
              
Tell a friend about this report 




Your Name:*





Your Email:*





Friend's Name:*





Friend's Email:*





Your Enquiry*









Send


 

































